Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.120

Commission. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Commission" means the agency established under RCW 29B.20.010.

[ 2024 c 164 s 212.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.